Maryland, session 2025, HB0836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–102.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LOCAL
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY, INCLUDING BALTIMORE CITY, MAY BY LOCAL LAW
AUTHORIZE ITS POLICE ACCOUNTABILITY BOARD TO EXERCISE INVESTIGATORY
AND SUBPOENA POWERS.
(2) A POLICE ACCOUNTABILITY BOARD MAY CONDUCT AN
INVESTIGATION OF A COMPLAINT OF POLICE MISCONDUCT UNDER THIS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0836*

HOUSE BILL 836
SUBSECTION CONCURRENTLY WITH A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY INVESTIGATING
THE COMPLAINT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.